Georgia, session 2025_26, HB799.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing for the election of the Board of Education of Long County, approved
March 23, 1977 (Ga. L. 1977, p. 3293), as amended, particularly by an Act approved June
3, 2003 (Ga. L. 2003, p. 4390), is amended by revising Section 4 as follows:
"Section 4. Each member of the board of education shall be compensated in the amount
of $500.00 per month. The vice chairperson shall be compensated $600.00 per month. The
chairperson shall be compensated $700.00 per month."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 799
- 1 -